Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1021
Attachment; receiver; reports; custody of property; duties.

Such receiver shall, when required, report his proceedings to the court, and hold all money collected by him and property which may come into his hands subject to the order of the court.

R.S.1867, Code § 216, p. 428;

R.S.1913, § 7750;

C.S.1922, § 8694;

C.S.1929, § 20-1021;

R.S.1943, § 25-1021.